New Jersey, session 222, A5201.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Artisanal Food means food that requires minimal processing and that is handcrafted in small batches or quantities by skilled makers using traditional non-industrial methods and quality specialty ingredients, including but not limited to, local sourced ingredients from small and midsized farms. b.    There is established in the Department of Agriculture the Artisanal Food Council. c.     The purpose of the council shall be to identify the needs and priorities relating to artisanal food industries in the State, promote a well-integrated local farming economy, and support the efforts of local farmers. d.    The council shall be comprised of nine public members, seven of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly, one of whom shall be appointment by the President of the Senate, and the nine public members shall include: (1)   three members of the farming industry; (2)   three artisanal food distributors; and (3)   three artisanal food producers, of which one member must be from an urban area, one member must be from a suburban area, and one member must be from a rural area. e.     The public members of the council shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel and other miscellaneous expenses necessary to perform their duties, within the limits of funds made available to the council for its purposes. f.     Each public member appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall serve terms of three years, except that of those members first appointed: three shall serve for a term of three years, two shall serve a term of two years, and two shall serve a term of one year.  Each public member appointed pursuant to subsection b. of this section by the Secretary of the Assembly and the President of the Senate shall serve terms of three years.  Each public member shall hold office for the term of the appointment and until a successor is appointed and qualified.  Any vacancies in the council membership shall be filled in the same manner as provided for the original appointment, and public members shall be eligible for reappointment to the council following the conclusion of their terms. g.    The council shall organize as soon as practicable, but no later than 60 days following the appointment of its members and shall select a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among the members.  The chairperson shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the council. h.    The council may meet at the call of its chair and hold hearings at the times and in the places it deems appropriate and necessary to fulfill its charge, but no less than twice per year.  The council shall be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available to it for its purposes. i.     The council may seek the advice of experts, such as persons specializing in the field of agriculture, education, law, human services, economic development, workforce development, or other related fields, as deemed appropriate by the membership of the council. j.     The Department of Agriculture shall provide staff services to the council as necessary. k.    The council shall: (1)   actively engage with farmers of all scale using traditional methods and local entrepreneurs in the State to determine what types of assistance might facilitate the economic viability farming and artisanal food making operations, connect farmers to artisanal food makers in the State, and inform labor chain participants of the laws, rules, regulations, programs, policies, and initiatives that are designed to assist farmers in enhancing the interconnection of operations between producers and distributors; (2)   apply for, accept, and distribute any grant of money from the federal government, private foundations, or other sources, which may be available for programs related to artisanal food production; (3)   when feasible and within the limits of available funding, provide grants to farms and small businesses to establish, expand, or improve artisanal food production; (4)   review the programs, policies, and initiatives of any department or agency of State government or any local organization, as appropriate, that concern the Department of Health, and make recommendations to the departments, agencies, and organizations that will enable them to better coordinate and improve the effectiveness of artisanal food making and distribution; and (5)   develop a biannual written report that identifies the needs, economic concerns, and practical problems affecting the artisanal food industry in the State to be annually submitted to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. The report shall include the following information; (a) any current economic data and significant market trends related to artisanal foods in the State, including changes in expenses, revenues or consumer behaviors; (b) the existing laws, rules, regulations, programs, policies, and initiatives of the Department of Agriculture, Department of Human Services, Department of Labor and Workforce Development, and any other department or agency of State government or any local organization, as appropriate, that concern the artisanal food industry, in order to make recommendations to the departments, agencies, and organizations that will enhance the coordination and effectiveness of artisanal food marketing and distribution; (c) the annual activities of the council; and (d) any recommendations for the adoption, revision, repeal of laws, rules, regulations, policies, standards, procedures, plans, programs, or guidelines which might promote and enhance the viability of artisanal foods in the State. l.     The council shall serve as an information and advisory resource for data and information on local artisanal food products, and as a coordinator providing expertise on marketing. m.   Throughout the year, the council shall provide recommendations and advice, if necessary, to the Governor, the Legislature, the Department of Agriculture, the State Agriculture Development Committee, county and municipal governments, county agriculture development boards and sub-regional agriculture retention boards, county boards of agriculture, and other appropriate policymakers and organizations on any issues related to the long-term economic status of farming and artisanal food production. n.    The council shall convene an annual, public forum to advertise and discuss issues relating to the artisanal food industry, and to develop strategies to promote the types of artisanal food available throughout the State.  The convention may feature local artisanal food manufacturers in the State, in an effort to increase public awareness of local artisanal food producers. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.